Texas statutes.
ESTATES CODE

TITLE 3. GUARDIANSHIP AND RELATED PROCEDURES

SUBTITLE A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 1001. PURPOSE AND CONSTRUCTION

Sec. 1001.001. POLICY; PURPOSE OF GUARDIANSHIP. (a) A court may appoint a guardian with either full or limited authority over an incapacitated person as indicated by the incapacitated person's actual mental or physical limitations and only as necessary to promote and protect the well-being of the incapacitated person.

(b) In creating a guardianship that gives a guardian limited authority over an incapacitated person, the court shall design the guardianship to encourage the development or maintenance of maximum self-reliance and independence in the incapacitated person, including by presuming that the incapacitated person retains capacity to make personal decisions regarding the person's residence.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 214 (H.B. 39), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 1001.002. LAWS APPLICABLE TO GUARDIANSHIPS. To the extent applicable and not inconsistent with other provisions of this code, the laws and rules governing estates of decedents apply to guardianships.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.

Sec. 1001.003. REFERENCES IN LAW MEANING INCAPACITATED PERSON. In this code or any other law, a reference to any of the following means an incapacitated person:

(1) a person who is mentally, physically, or legally incompetent;

(2) a person who is judicially declared incompetent;

(3) an incompetent or an incompetent person;

(4) a person of unsound mind; or

(5) a habitual drunkard.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 823 (H.B. 2759), Sec. 1.02, eff. January 1, 2014.